Montana, session 2025, SB212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 7] may be cited as the "Right to Compute Act".
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 212
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 212
Section 2. Legislative findings -- intent. The legislature finds that the rights to acquire, possess,
and protect property under Article II, section 3, of the Montana constitution, and the freedom of expression
under Article II, section 7, of the Montana constitution, also embody the notion of a fundamental right to own
and make use of technological tools, including computational resources. Any restrictions placed by the
government on the ability to privately own or make use of computational resources for lawful purposes must be
limited to those demonstrably necessary and narrowly tailored to fulfill a compelling government interest in
public health or safety.
Section 3. Right to compute. Government actions that restrict the ability to privately own or make
use of computational resources for lawful purposes, which infringes on citizens' fundamental rights to property
and free expression, must be limited to those demonstrably necessary and narrowly tailored to fulfill a
compelling government interest in public health or safety.
Section 4. Infrastructure controlled by CRITICAL artificial intelligence system -- shutdown. (1)
When critical infrastructure facilities are controlled in whole or in part by an a critical artificial intelligence
system, the deployer shall ensure the capability to disable the artificial intelligence system's control over the
infrastructure and revert to human control within a reasonable amount of time.
(2) When enacting a full shutdown, the deployer shall consider, as appropriate, disruptions to
critical infrastructure that may result from a shutdown.
(3) Deployers shall implement, annually review, and test a risk management policy that includes a
fallback mechanism and a redundancy and mitigation plan to ensure the deployer can continue operations and
maintain control of the critical infrastructure facility without the use of the artificial intelligence system develop a
risk management policy after deploying the system that is reasonable and considers guidance and standards in
the latest version of the artificial intelligence risk management framework from the national institute of
standards and technology, the ISO/IEC 4200 artificial intelligence standard from the international organization
for standardization, or another nationally or internationally recognized risk management framework for artificial
intelligence systems. A plan prepared under federal requirements constitutes compliance with this section.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 212
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 212
Section 5. Preservation of intellectual property. Nothing in [sections 1 through 7] may be
construed to alter, diminish, or interfere with the rights and remedies available under federal or state intellectual
property laws, including but not limited to patent, copyright, trademark, and trade secret laws.
Section 6. Preemption by federal law. Nothing in [sections 1 through 7] may be construed to
preempt federal laws.
Section 7. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 7], the following definitions apply:
(1) "Artificial intelligence system" means any machine learning-based system that, for any explicit
or implicit objective, infers from the inputs the system receives how to generate outputs, including but not
limited to content, decisions, predictions, and recommendations that can influence physical or virtual
environments.
(2) "Compelling government interest in public health or safety" means a government interest of the
highest order in protecting the health and safety of the public that cannot be achieved through less restrictive
means. This includes but is not limited to:
(a) ensuring that a critical infrastructure facilities facility controlled by an artificial intelligence
system can be shut down and the critical infrastructure facility can be returned to human control develops a risk
management policy;
(b) addressing conduct that deceives or defrauds the public;
(c) protecting individuals, especially minors, from harm by a person who distributes deepfakes and
other harmful synthetic content with actual knowledge of the nature of that material; and
(d) taking actions that prevent or abate common law nuisances created by physical datacenter
infrastructure.
(3) "Computational resources" means any tools, technologies, systems, or infrastructure, whether
digital, analog, existing, or some other form, that facilitate any form of computation, data processing, storage,
transmission, manipulation, control, creation, dissemination, or use of information and data. This includes but is
not limited to hardware, software, algorithms, sensors, networks, protocols, platforms, services, systems,
cryptography, machine learning, or quantum applications.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 212
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 212
(4) (a) "Critical artificial intelligence" means an artificial intelligence system that is designed and
deployed to make, or is a substantial factor in making, a consequential decision.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) an artificial intelligence system that is intended to:
(A) perform a narrow procedural task;
(B) improve the result of a previously completed human activity;
(C) perform a preparatory task to an assessment relevant to a consequential decision; or
(D) detect a decision-making pattern or a deviation from a preexisting decision-making pattern;
(ii) antifraud, antimalware, antivirus, calculator, cybersecurity, database, data storage, firewall,
internet domain registration, internet-website loading, networking, robocall-filtering, spam-filtering, spell-
checking, spreadsheet, web-caching, web-hosting, or search engine technologies or similar technologies; or
(iii) a technology that communicates in natural language for the purpose of providing users with
information, makes referrals or recommendations, answers questions, or generates other content and that is
subject to an acceptable use policy that prohibits the generation of unlawful content.
(4)(5) "Critical infrastructure facility" has the same meaning as provided in 82-1-601.
(5)(6) "Deployer" means an individual, company, or other organization that utilizes an artificial
intelligence system.
(6)(7) "Government actions" means any law, ordinance, regulation, rule, policy, fee, condition, test,
permit, or administrative practice enacted by a government entity that restricts the common or intended use of
computational resources by its owner or invitees.
(7)(8) "Government entity" means any unit of state government including the state, counties, cities,
towns, or political subdivisions, and any branch, department, division, office, or government entity of state or
local government.
Section 8. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are severable from the
invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications, the part remains in
effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 212
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 212
Section 9. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 7] are intended to be codified as a new part
of Title 2, chapter 10, and the provisions of Title 2, chapter 10, apply to [sections 1 through 7].
Section 10. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 212
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 212, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 212
INTRODUCED BY D. ZOLNIKOV
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING LAWS RELATED TO TECHNOLOGY; CREATING THE RIGHT TO
COMPUTE ACT; REQUIRING SHUTDOWN CAPABILITIES A RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY FOR CRITICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE FACILITIES CONTROLLED BY AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; PROVIDING
DEFINITIONS; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”